Vermont, session 2025-2026, H713.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2022, an employer shall not employ any
employee at a rate of less than $12.55, and on each subsequent January 1, the
minimum wage rate shall be increased by five percent or the percentage
VT LEG #386282 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.713
2026 Page 2 of 6
increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. city average, not seasonally
adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or
successor agency, rounded to one decimal point, for the 12 months preceding
the previous September 1, whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the
minimum wage be decreased. The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the
nearest $0.01.
(2) An employer in the hotel, motel, tourist place, and restaurant
industry shall not employ a service or tipped employee at a basic wage rate less
than one-half the minimum wage. As used in this subdivision, “a service or
tipped employee” means an employee of a hotel, motel, tourist place, or
restaurant who customarily and regularly receives more than $120.00 per
month in tips for direct and personal customer service.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the hourly minimum wage for
individuals employed by a nationwide fast food chain shall be $20.00 per hour,
and on each subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased
by the same percentage as the annual increase set forth in subdivision (1) of
this subsection. As used in this subdivision, “a nationwide fast food chain”
means a set of limited-service restaurants consisting of more than 60
establishments nationally that share a common brand, or that are characterized
by standardized options for decor, marketing, packaging, products, and
services, and which are primarily engaged in providing food and beverages for
VT LEG #386282 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.713
2026 Page 3 of 6
immediate consumption on or off the premises where patrons generally order
or select items and pay before consuming, with limited or no table service.
This subdivision applies regardless of whether the employer owns the national
brand or is a franchisee or licensee of the national brand. A “limited-service
restaurant” includes establishments with the North American Classification
System Code of 722513.
(4) If the minimum wage rate established by the U.S. government is
greater than the rate established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
for any year, the minimum wage rate for that year shall be the rate established
by the U.S. government.
* * *
Sec. 2. FAST FOOD COUNCIL; REPORT
(a) Creation. The Fast Food Council is created within the Department of
Labor for the purpose of studying and recommending minimum standards on
wages, working hours, and working conditions adequate to ensure and
maintain the health, safety, and welfare of individuals employed by nationwide
fast food chains.
(b) Membership.
(1) The Council shall consist of the following five voting members:
(A) a representative of the fast food restaurant industry, appointed by
the Governor;
VT LEG #386282 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.713
2026 Page 4 of 6
(B) a fast food restaurant franchisee or restaurant owner, appointed
by the Governor;
(C) a fast food restaurant employee, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(D) an advocate for fast food restaurant employees, appointed by the
Committee on Committees; and
(E) one unaffiliated member of the public, appointed by the
Governor, who:
(i) is not an owner, franchisee, officer, or employee in the fast
food restaurant industry;
(ii) is not an employee, officer, or member of a labor organization
representing fast food restaurant employees; and
(iii) who has not received income from the fast food restaurant
industry or any labor organization for a period of two years prior to
appointment.
(2) The Council shall consist of the following two nonvoting members:
(A) a representative from the Department of Labor, appointed by the
Commissioner of Labor; and
(B) a representative from the Office of the Governor, appointed by
the Governor.
VT LEG #386282 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.713
2026 Page 5 of 6
(3) Members of the Council shall be appointed on or before February
28, 2027, and all terms shall end on January 1, 2031.
(4) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as for the original
appointments for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(c) Powers and duties. The Council shall study:
(1) minimum standards on wages, working hours, training, and other
working conditions adequate to ensure and maintain the health, safety, and
welfare of individuals employed by nationwide fast food chains; and
(2) the effectiveness of the Department of Labor’s response to issues
affecting the health, safety, and welfare of individuals employed by nationwide
fast food chains.
(d) Reports. On or before December 15, 2028, and annually thereafter
through January 1, 2031, the Council shall submit a report to the House
Committee on General and Housing and to the Senate Committee on Economic
Development, Housing and General Affairs with its findings and any
recommendations for legislative action.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The representative from the Department of Labor appointed pursuant
to subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be responsible for convening the
first meeting of the Council.
VT LEG #386282 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.713
2026 Page 6 of 6
(2) The voting members of the Council shall select the Chair and the
Vice Chair from among its members at the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the members of the Council shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of any business of the Council. Any action taken by the
Council shall be by a majority of the voting members pursuant to 1 V.S.A.
§ 172.
(4) The Council shall convene on or before May 1, 2027, and shall cease
to exist on January 1, 2031.
(5) Meetings of the Council shall be open to the public pursuant to
1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2.
(f) Assistance. The Council shall have administrative and technical
assistance from the Department of Labor.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Council shall be
entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than four meetings a year. These
payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the Department of Labor.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386282 v.1